New York, session 2025-2026, S3146.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6529-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 6529-a. Licensed to practice in another state or territory. 4 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, any person who is 5 licensed to practice as a physician in another state or territory, who 6 is in good standing in such state or territory may provide professional 7 services within this state to persons seeking reproductive health 8 services without first being licensed pursuant to the provisions of this 9 article. Such services shall be provided only after such person applies 10 for a license pursuant to the provisions of this article, as may be 11 applicable, and demonstrates their intent to provide reproductive health 12 services by providing a letter declaring the person's intention to 13 provide such services and a letter from an employer or health care enti- 14 ty indicating that the person has accepted employment or entered into a 15 contract to provide reproductive health services, the person's start 16 date and the location where reproductive health services will be 17 provided. Such person may continue providing services pursuant to this 18 section until such time that their license or certification to practice 19 is approved or denied. Provided however, that such person shall comply 20 with all applicable licensure and regulatory requirements and shall 21 practice within the scope of their license. Provided further, this 22 section shall not apply to persons licensed in a state or territory EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03158-01-5 S. 3146 2 1 determined to have substandard or nonconforming professional licensing 2 requirements, as determined by the commissioner. 3 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6546-a to 4 read as follows: 5 § 6546-a. Licensed to practice in another state or territory. 6 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, any person who is 7 licensed to practice as a physician assistant in another state or terri- 8 tory, who is in good standing in such state or territory may provide 9 professional services within this state to persons seeking reproductive 10 health services without first being licensed pursuant to the provisions 11 of this article. Such services shall be provided only after such person 12 applies for a license pursuant to the provisions of this article, as may 13 be applicable, and demonstrates their intent to provide reproductive 14 health services by providing a letter declaring the person's intention 15 to provide such services and a letter from an employer or health care 16 entity indicating that the person has accepted employment or entered 17 into a contract to provide reproductive health services, the person's 18 start date and the location where reproductive health services will be 19 provided. Such person may continue providing services pursuant to this 20 section until such time that their license or certification to practice 21 is approved or denied. Provided however, that such person shall comply 22 with all applicable licensure and regulatory requirements and shall 23 practice within the scope of their license. Provided further, this 24 section shall not apply to persons licensed in a state or territory 25 determined to have substandard or nonconforming professional licensing 26 requirements, as determined by the commissioner. 27 § 3. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6907-b to 28 read as follows: 29 § 6907-b. Licensed to practice in another state or territory. 30 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, any person who is 31 licensed to practice as a nurse practitioner or registered professional 32 nurse in another state or territory, who is in good standing in such 33 state or territory may provide professional services within this state 34 to persons seeking reproductive health services without first being 35 licensed pursuant to the provisions of this article. Such services shall 36 be provided only after such person applies for a license pursuant to the 37 provisions of this article, as may be applicable, and demonstrates their 38 intent to provide reproductive health services by providing a letter 39 declaring the person's intention to provide such services and a letter 40 from an employer or health care entity indicating that the person has 41 accepted employment or entered into a contract to provide reproductive 42 health services, the person's start date and the location where repro- 43 ductive health services will be provided. Such person may continue 44 providing services pursuant to this section until such time that their 45 license or certification to practice is approved or denied. Provided 46 however, that such person shall comply with all applicable licensure and 47 regulatory requirements and shall practice within the scope of their 48 license. Provided further, this section shall not apply to persons 49 licensed in a state or territory determined to have substandard or 50 nonconforming professional licensing requirements, as determined by the 51 commissioner. 52 § 4. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6958-a to 53 read as follows: 54 § 6958-a. Licensed to practice in another state or territory. 55 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, any person who is 56 licensed to practice as a midwife in another state or territory, who is S. 3146 3 1 in good standing in such state or territory may provide professional 2 services within this state to persons seeking reproductive health 3 services without first being licensed pursuant to the provisions of this 4 article. Such services shall be provided only after such person applies 5 for a license pursuant to the provisions of this article, as may be 6 applicable, and demonstrates their intent to provide reproductive health 7 services by providing a letter declaring the person's intention to 8 provide such services and a letter from an employer or health care enti- 9 ty indicating that the person has accepted employment or entered into a 10 contract to provide reproductive health services, the person's start 11 date and the location where reproductive health services will be 12 provided. Such person may continue providing services pursuant to this 13 section until such time that their license or certification to practice 14 is approved or denied. Provided however, that such person shall comply 15 with all applicable licensure and regulatory requirements and shall 16 practice within the scope of their license. Provided further, this 17 section shall not apply to persons licensed in a state or territory 18 determined to have substandard or nonconforming professional licensing 19 requirements, as determined by the commissioner. 20 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.